District of Columbia statutes.
31-5321

Applicability of provisions.

Except as herein provided, societies shall be governed by this chapter and shall be exempt from all other provisions of the insurance laws of the District unless they are expressly designated therein, or unless they are specifically made applicable by this chapter.

History

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1222, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1251.